North Carolina statutes. Chapter 48. Adoptions.
Article 3. Adoption of Minors.

Part 1. General Provisions.

§ 48-3-100.
Application of Article.

This Article shall apply to the adoption of minors by adults who are not their stepparents.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2.

§ 48-3-201.
Who may place minors for adoption.

Only the following may place the minor for adoption:

An agency,

A guardian,

Both parents acting jointly, if

Both parents are married to each other and living together, or

One parent has legal custody of a minor and the other has physical custody but neither has both, or

A parent with legal and physical custody of a minor, except as provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection.

A parent, guardian, or agency that places a minor directly for adoption shall execute a consent to the minor’s adoption pursuant to Part 6 of this Article.

A parent or guardian of a minor who wants an agency to place the minor for adoption must execute a relinquishment to the agency pursuant to Part 7 of this Article before the agency can place the minor.

An agency having legal and physical custody of a minor may place the minor for adoption at any time after a relinquishment is executed by anyone as permitted by

G.S. 48-3-701

. The agency may place the minor for adoption even if other consents are required before an adoption can be granted, unless an individual whose consent is required notifies the agency in writing of the individual’s objections before the placement. The agency shall act promptly after accepting a relinquishment to obtain all other necessary consents, relinquishments, or terminations of any guardian’s authority pursuant to Chapter 35A of the General Statutes or parental rights pursuant to Article 11 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1997-215, s. 11(b); 1998-202, s. 13(j).

§ 48-3-202.
Direct placement for adoption.

In a direct placement, a parent or guardian must personally select a prospective adoptive parent, but a parent or guardian may obtain assistance from another person or entity, or an adoption facilitator, in locating or evaluating a prospective adoptive parent, subject to the limitations of Article 10 of this Chapter.

Information about a prospective adoptive parent shall be provided to a prospective placing parent or guardian by the prospective adoptive parent, the prospective adoptive parent’s attorney, or a person or entity assisting the parent or guardian. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, this information shall include the preplacement assessment prepared pursuant to Part 3 of this Article, and may include additional information requested by the parent or guardian. The agency preparing the preplacement assessment may redact from the preplacement assessment the information described in G.S. 48-3-303(c)(12).

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2; 2001-150, s. 6; 2015-54, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-54, s. 6, effective June 4, 2015, in subsection (b), inserted “prospective placing” in the first sentence, and rewrote the last sentence.

§ 48-3-203.
Agency placement adoption.

An agency may acquire legal and physical custody of a minor for purposes of adoptive placement only by means of a relinquishment pursuant to Part 7 of this Article or by a court order terminating the rights and duties of a parent or guardian of the minor.

An agency shall give any individual, upon request, a written statement of the services it provides, its procedure for selecting a prospective adoptive parent for a minor, including the role of the minor’s parent or guardian in the selection process, and the procedure for an agency identified adoption and the disclosures permitted under

G.S. 48-9-109

. This statement shall include a schedule of any fee or expenses charged or required to be paid by the agency and a summary of the provisions of this Chapter that pertain to the requirements and consequences of a relinquishment and to the selection of a prospective adoptive parent.

An agency may notify the parent when a placement has occurred and when an adoption decree is issued.

An agency may place a minor for adoption only with an individual for whom a favorable preplacement assessment has been prepared. Placement shall be made as follows:

If the agency has agreed to place the minor with the prospective adoptive parent selected by the parent or guardian, the minor shall be placed with the individual selected by the parent or guardian.

If the agency has not agreed to place the minor with the prospective adoptive parent selected by the parent or guardian, the minor shall be placed with the prospective adoptive parent selected by the agency on the basis of the preplacement assessment. The selection may not be delegated, but may be based on criteria requested by a parent who relinquishes the child to the agency.

(d1)

A minor who is in the custody or placement responsibility of a county department of social services shall not be placed with a selected prospective adoptive parent prior to the completion of an investigation of the individual’s criminal history pursuant to

G.S. 48-3-309

or

G.S. 131D-10.3

A and, based on the criminal history, a determination as to the individual’s fitness to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children.

In addition to the authority granted in

G.S. 131D-10.5

, the Social Services Commission may adopt rules for placements by agencies consistent with the purposes of this Chapter.

An agency may release identifying information as provided in

G.S. 48-9-104

.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1953, c. 906; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 911, s. 7; c. 982; 1975, c. 702, ss. 1-3; 1977, c. 879, s. 5; 1985, c. 758, ss. 10, 11; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1998-229, s. 13; 2001-150, s. 7.

§ 48-3-204.
Recruitment of adoptive parents.

The Social Services Commission may adopt rules requiring agencies to adopt and follow appropriate recruitment plans for prospective adoptive parents.

The Division may maintain a statewide photo-listing service for all agencies within this State as a means of recruiting adoptive parents for minors who have been legally freed for adoption.

Agencies and the Division shall cooperate with similar agencies in other states, and with national adoption exchanges in an effort to recruit suitable adoptive parents.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2.

§ 48-3-205.
Disclosure of background information.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, before placing a minor for adoption, an individual or agency placing the minor, or the individual’s agent, must compile and provide to the prospective adoptive parent a written document containing the following information:

The date of the birth of the minor and the minor’s weight at birth and any other reasonably available nonidentifying information about the minor that is relevant to the adoption decision or to the minor’s development and well-being;

Age of the biological parents in years at the time of the minor’s birth;

Heritage of the biological parents, which shall consist of nationality, ethnic background, and race;

Education of the biological parents, which shall be the number of years of school completed by the biological parents at the time of the minor’s birth; and

General physical appearance of the biological parents.

In addition, the written document must also include all reasonably available nonidentifying information about the health of the minor, the biological parents, and other members of the biological parents’ families that is relevant to the adoption decision or to the minor’s health and development. This health-related information shall include each such individual’s present state of physical and mental health, health and genetic histories, and information concerning any history of emotional, physical, sexual, or substance abuse. This health-related information shall also include an account of the prenatal and postnatal care received by the minor. The information described in this subsection, if known, shall, upon written request of the minor, be made available to the minor upon the minor reaching age 18 or upon the minor’s marriage or emancipation.

Information provided under this section, or any information directly or indirectly derived from such information, may not be used against the provider or against an individual described in subsection (a) of this section who is the subject of the information in any criminal action or any civil action for damages. In addition, information provided under this section may not be admitted in evidence against the provider or against an individual described in subsection (a) of this section who is the subject of the information in any other action or proceeding.

The agency placing the minor shall receive and preserve any additional health-related information obtained after the preparation of the document described in subsection (a) of this section.

The Division shall develop and make available forms designed to collect the information described in subsection (a) of this section. However, forms reasonably equivalent to those provided by the Division may be substituted.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1957, c. 778, s. 7; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1979, c. 739, ss. 1, 2; 1981, c. 924, ss. 2, 3; 1983, c. 454, s. 6; 1993, c. 539, s. 411; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 2012-16, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-16, s. 4, effective October 1, 2012, added the last sentence in subsection (d). For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 48-3-206.
Affidavit of parentage.

To assist the court in determining that a direct placement was valid and all necessary consents have been obtained, the parent or guardian who placed the minor shall execute an affidavit setting out names, last known addresses, and marital status of the minor’s parents or possible parents. If the placing parent or guardian is unavailable to execute the affidavit, the affidavit may be prepared by a knowledgeable individual who shall sign the affidavit and indicate the source of the individual’s knowledge.

In an agency placement, the agency shall obtain from at least one individual who relinquishes a minor to the agency an affidavit setting out the information required in subsection (a) of this section. This affidavit is not necessary when the agency acquires legal and physical custody of a minor for purposes of adoptive placement by a court order terminating the parental rights of a parent or guardian.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1977, c. 879, s. 6; 1983, c. 454, s. 6; 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 2001-208, s. 14; 2001-487, s. 101.

§ 48-3-207.
Interstate placements.

An interstate placement of a minor for purposes of adoption shall comply with the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, Article 38 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1998-202, s. 13(n).

Legal Periodicals.

For article on interstate and foreign adoptions in North Carolina, see 40 N.C.L. Rev. 691 (1962).

Part 3. Preplacement Assessment.

§ 48-3-301.
Preplacement assessment required.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, placement of a minor may occur only if a written preplacement assessment:

Has been completed or updated within the 18 months immediately preceding the placement; and

Contains a finding that the individual who is the subject of the assessment is suitable to be an adoptive parent, either in general or for a specific minor.

A preplacement assessment is not required in an independent adoption when a prospective adoptive parent is a grandparent, full or half sibling, first cousin, aunt, uncle, great-aunt, great-uncle, or great-grandparent of the minor.

If a direct placement is made in violation of this section:

The prospective adoptive parent shall request any preplacement assessment already commenced to be expedited, and if none has been commenced, shall obtain a preplacement assessment from an agency as authorized by

G.S. 48-1-109

; in either case, the assessment shall include the fact and date of placement;

The court may not enter a decree of adoption until both a favorable preplacement assessment and a report to the court have been completed and filed, and the court may not order a report to the court for at least 30 days after the preplacement assessment has been completed; and

If the person who placed the minor executes a consent before receiving a copy of the preplacement assessment,

G.S. 48-3-608

shall determine the time within which that person may revoke.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1957, c. 778, s. 2; 1967, c. 880, s. 2; 1987, c. 716, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 410; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1997-215, s. 19(a); 2015-54, s. 7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-54, s. 7, effective June 4, 2015, substituted “in an independent adoption when a prospective adoptive parent is a grandparent, full or half sibling” for “when a parent or guardian places a minor directly with a grandparent, sibling” in subsection (b).

§ 48-3-302.
Request for preplacement assessment.

An individual seeking to adopt may request a preplacement assessment at any time by an agency authorized by

G.S. 48-1-109

to prepare preplacement assessments.

An individual requesting a preplacement assessment need not have located a prospective adoptee when the request is made.

An individual may have more than one preplacement assessment or may request that an assessment, once initiated, not be completed.

If an individual is seeking to adopt a minor from a particular agency, the agency may require the individual to be assessed by its own employee, even if the individual has already had a favorable preplacement assessment completed by another agency.

If an individual requesting a preplacement assessment has identified a prospective adoptive child and has otherwise been unable to obtain a preplacement assessment, the county department of social services must, upon request, prepare or contract for the preparation of the preplacement assessment. As used in this subsection, “unable to obtain a preplacement assessment” includes the inability to obtain a preplacement assessment at the fee the county department of social services is permitted to charge the individual. Except as provided in this subsection, no agency is required to conduct a preplacement assessment unless it agrees to do so.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1957, c. 778, s. 2; 1967, c. 880, s. 2; 1987, c. 716, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 410; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1997-215, s. 15.

§ 48-3-303.
Content and timing of preplacement assessment.

A preplacement assessment shall be completed within 90 days after a request has been accepted.

The preplacement assessment must be based on at least one personal interview with each individual being assessed in the individual’s residence and any report received pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

The preplacement assessment shall, after a reasonable investigation, report on the following about the individual being assessed:

Nationality, race, or ethnicity, and any religious preference;

Marital and family status and history, including the presence of any children born to or adopted by the individual and any other children in the household;

Date of birth and physical and mental health, including any addiction to alcohol or drugs;

Educational and employment history and any special skills;

Property and income, and current financial information provided by the individual;

Reason for wanting to adopt;

Any previous request for an assessment or involvement in an adoptive placement and the outcome of the assessment or placement;

Whether the individual has ever been a respondent in a domestic violence proceeding or a proceeding concerning a minor who was allegedly abused, dependent, neglected, abandoned, or delinquent, and the outcome of the proceeding;

Whether the individual has ever been convicted of a crime other than a minor traffic violation;

Whether the individual has located a parent interested in placing a child with the individual for adoption and a brief, nonidentifying description of the parent and the child; and

Any other fact or circumstance that may be relevant to a determination of the individual’s suitability to be an adoptive parent, including the quality of the environment in the home and the functioning of any children in the household.

The agency preparing the preplacement assessment may redact from the preplacement assessment provided to a placing parent or guardian detailed information reflecting the prospective adoptive parent’s income, expenditures, assets, liabilities, and social security numbers, and detailed information about the prospective adoptive parent’s extended family members, including surnames, names of employers, names of schools attended, social security numbers, telephone numbers and addresses, and other similarly detailed information about extended family members obtained under subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

The most recent amended or updated preplacement assessment that meets the requirements of this section and G.S. 48-3-301(a), including subsequent amendments or partial updates completed as of the time of delivery, shall constitute the preplacement assessment for the purpose of meeting any requirement of this Chapter that a copy of the preplacement assessment be delivered to a court or a placing parent, guardian, or agency.When any of the above is not reasonably available, the preplacement assessment shall state why it is unavailable.

The agency shall conduct an investigation for any criminal record as permitted by law. If a prospective adoptive parent is seeking to adopt a minor who is in the custody or placement responsibility of a county department of social services, a county department of social services shall have the prospective adoptive parent’s criminal history and the criminal histories of all individuals 18 years of age or older who reside in the prospective adoptive home investigated pursuant to

G.S. 48-3-309

, and in accordance with

G.S. 48-3-309

(b), make a determination as to the prospective adoptive parent’s fitness to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children and as to whether other individuals required to be checked are fit for an adoptive child to reside with them in the home.

In the preplacement assessment, the agency shall review the information obtained pursuant to subsections (b), (c)(2) through (c)(13), and (d) of this section and evaluate the individual’s strengths and needs to be an adoptive parent. The agency shall then determine whether the individual is suitable to be an adoptive parent.

If the agency determines that the individual is suitable to be an adoptive parent, the preplacement assessment shall include specific factors which support that determination.

If the agency determines that the individual is not suitable to be an adoptive parent, the preplacement assessment shall state the specific concerns which support that determination. A specific concern is one that reasonably indicates that placement of any minor, or a particular minor, in the home of the individual would pose a significant risk of harm to the well-being of the minor.

In addition to the information and finding required by subsections (c) through (g) of this section, the preplacement assessment must contain a list of the sources of information on which it is based.

The Social Services Commission shall have authority to establish by rule additional standards for preplacement assessments.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2; 1998-229, s. 14; 2001-150, s. 8; 2005-114, s. 2; 2007-276, s. 8; 2012-16, s. 5; 2018-68, ss. 6.1, 6.2; 2018-142, s. 9; 2019-172, s. 6; 2019-240, s. 17.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-114, s. 2, effective June 24, 2005, rewrote the second sentence in subsection (d).

Session Laws 2007-276, s. 8, effective October 1, 2007, substituted “in accordance with G.S. 48-3-309(b),” for “based on the criminal history,” near the middle of subsection (d).

Session Laws 2012-16, s. 5, effective October 1, 2012, in subdivision (c)(12), added “income and” preceding “financial account balances” and “and social security numbers,” preceding “and detailed information.” For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2018-68, ss. 6.1, 6.2, effective October 1, 2018, added subdivision (c)(13); and substituted “preplacement” for “replacement” in subsection (g).

Session Laws 2018-142, s. 9, effective December 15, 2018, in subsection (g), substituted “preplacement” for “replacement” preceding “assessment shall.”

Session Laws 2019-172, s. 6, effective October 1, 2019, substituted “income, expenditures, assets, liabilities,” for “income and financial account balances” in subdivision (c)(12).

Session Laws 2019-240, s. 17, effective November 6, 2019, substituted “Nationality” for “Age and date of birth, nationality” in subdivision (c)(1); substituted “Date of birth and physical” for “Physical” in subdivision (c)(3); and in subsection (e), in the first sentence, substituted “(c)(2) through (c)(13)” for “(c)” and substituted “needs” for “weaknesses.”

§ 48-3-304.
Fees for preplacement assessment.

An agency that prepares a preplacement assessment may charge a reasonable fee for doing so, even if the individual being assessed requests that it not be completed. No fee may be charged except pursuant to a written agreement which must be signed by the individual to be charged prior to the beginning of the assessment. The fee agreement may not be based on the outcome of the assessment or any adoption.

An assessment fee is subject to review by the court pursuant to

G.S. 48-2-602

and

G.S. 48-2-603

if the person who is assessed files a petition to adopt.

The Department shall set the maximum fees, based on the individual’s ability to pay and other factors, which may be charged by county departments of social services. The Department shall require waiver of fees for those unable to pay. Fees collected under this section shall be applied to the costs of preparing preplacement assessments and shall be used by the county department of social services to supplement and not to supplant appropriated funds.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2.

§ 48-3-305.
Agency disposition of preplacement assessments.

The agency shall give a copy of any completed or incomplete preplacement assessment to the individual who was the subject of the assessment. If the assessment contains a finding that an individual is not suitable to be an adoptive parent, the agency shall contemporaneously file the original with the Division.

The agency shall retain a copy of a completed or incomplete preplacement assessment for at least five years.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2.

§ 48-3-306.
Favorable preplacement assessments.

An individual who receives a preplacement assessment containing a finding that the individual is suitable to be an adoptive parent shall provide a copy of the assessment to any person or agency considering the placement of a minor with the individual for adoption and shall also attach a copy of the assessment to any petition to adopt.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2.

§ 48-3-307.
Assessments completed after placement.

If a placement occurs before a preplacement assessment is completed, the prospective adoptive parent shall deliver a copy of the assessment when completed, whether favorable or unfavorable, to the parent or guardian who placed the minor. A prospective adoptive parent, who cannot after the exercise of due diligence personally locate the parent or guardian who placed the minor, may deposit a copy of the preplacement assessment in the United States mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the address of the parent or guardian given in the consent, and the date of receipt by the parent or guardian for purposes of

G.S. 48-3-608

shall be deemed to be the date of delivery or last attempted delivery.

If a petition for adoption is filed before the preplacement assessment is completed, the prospective adoptive parent shall attach to the petition an affidavit explaining why the assessment has not been completed and, upon completion of the assessment, shall file it with the court in which the petition is pending.

A prospective adoptive parent shall file or cause to be filed a certificate indicating that the prospective adoptive parent has delivered a copy of the assessment to the parent or guardian who placed the minor for adoption.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2; 2001-150, s. 9.

§ 48-3-308.
Response to unfavorable preplacement assessment.

Each agency shall have a procedure for allowing an individual who has received an unfavorable preplacement assessment to have the assessment reviewed by the agency. In addition to the authority in

G.S. 131D-10.5

, the Social Services Commission shall have authority to adopt rules implementing this section.

An individual who receives an unfavorable preplacement assessment may, after exhausting the agency’s procedures for internal review, prepare and file a written response with the Division and the agency. The Division shall attach the response to the unfavorable assessment.

The Division shall acknowledge receipt of the response but shall have no authority to take any action with respect to the response.

If an unfavorable preplacement assessment is completed and filed with the Division and a minor has been placed with a prospective adoptive parent who is the subject of the unfavorable assessment, the Division shall notify the county department of social services, which shall take appropriate action.

An unfavorable preplacement assessment and any response filed with the Division under this section shall not be public records as set forth in Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2.

§ 48-3-309.
Mandatory preplacement criminal checks of prospective adoptive parents seeking to adopt a minor who is in the custody or placement responsibility of a county department of social services and mandatory preplacement criminal checks of all individuals 18 years of age or older who reside in the prospective adoptive home.

The Department shall ensure that the criminal histories of all prospective adoptive parents seeking to adopt a minor who is in the custody or placement responsibility of a county department of social services and the criminal histories of all individuals 18 years of age or older who reside in the prospective adoptive home are checked prior to placement and, based on the criminal history, a determination is made as to the prospective adoptive parent’s fitness to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children and whether other individuals required to be checked are fit for an adoptive child to reside with them in the home. The Department shall ensure that all individuals required to be checked are checked prior to placement for county, state, and federal criminal histories.

A county department of social services shall issue an unfavorable preplacement assessment to a prospective adoptive parent if an individual required to submit to a criminal history check pursuant to subsection (a) of this section has a criminal history. A county department of social services shall issue an unfavorable preplacement assessment to a prospective adoptive parent if the county department of social services determines, pursuant to G.S. 48-3-303(e), that, based on other criminal convictions, whether felony or misdemeanor, the prospective adoptive parent is unfit to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children or other individuals required to be checked are unfit for an adoptive child to reside with them in the home.

histories

The Department of Public Safety shall provide to the Department of Health and Human Services the criminal history of any individual required to be checked under subsection (a) of this section as requested by the Department and obtained from the State and National Repositories of Criminal Histories. The Department shall provide to the Department of Public Safety, along with the request, the fingerprints of any individual to be checked, any additional information required by the Department of Public Safety, and a form consenting to the check of the criminal record and to the use of fingerprints and other identifying information required by the State or National Repositories signed by the individual to be checked. The fingerprints of any individual to be checked shall be forwarded to the State Bureau of Investigation for a search of the State’s criminal history record file, and the State Bureau of Investigation shall forward a set of fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.

At the time of the request for a preplacement assessment or at a subsequent time prior to placement, any individual whose criminal history is to be checked shall be furnished with a statement substantially similar to the following:

Click to viewRefusal to consent to a criminal history check by any individual required to be checked under G.S. 48-3-309(a) is grounds for the issuance by a county department of social services of an unfavorable preplacement assessment. Any person who intentionally falsifies any information required to be furnished to conduct the criminal history is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

The Department shall notify the prospective adoptive parent’s supervising county department of social services of the results of the criminal history check. In accordance with the federal and State law regulating the dissemination of the contents of the criminal history file, the Department shall not release or disclose any portion of an individual’s criminal history to the prospective adoptive parent or any other individual required to be checked. The Department, however, shall ensure that the prospective adoptive parent or any other individual required to be checked is notified of the individual’s right to review the criminal history information, the procedure for completing or challenging the accuracy of the criminal history, and the prospective adoptive parent’s right to contest the preplacement assessment of the county department of social services.A prospective adoptive parent who disagrees with the preplacement assessment of the county department of social services may request a review of the assessment pursuant to G.S. 48-3-308(a).

All the information that the Department receives through the checking of the criminal history is privileged information and is not a public record but is for the exclusive use of the Department and those persons authorized under this section to receive the information. The Department may destroy the information after it is used for the purposes authorized by this section after one calendar year.

There is no liability for negligence on the part of a State or local agency, or the employees of a State or local agency, arising from any action taken or omission by any of them in carrying out the provisions of this section. The immunity established by this subsection shall not extend to gross negligence, wanton conduct, or intentional wrongdoing that would otherwise be actionable. The immunity established by this subsection shall be deemed to have been waived to the extent of indemnification by insurance, indemnification under Article 31A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, and to the extent sovereign immunity is waived under the Tort Claims Act, as set forth in Article 31 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

The Department of Public Safety shall perform the State and national criminal history checks on prospective adoptive parents seeking to adopt a minor in the custody or placement responsibility of a county department of social services and all individuals 18 years of age or older who reside in the prospective adoptive home and shall charge the Department of Health and Human Services a reasonable fee only for conducting the checks of the national criminal history records authorized by this section. The Division of Social Services, Department of Health and Human Services, shall bear the costs of implementing this section.

“NOTICE MANDATORY CRIMINAL HISTORY CHECK: NORTH CAROLINA LAW REQUIRES THAT A CRIMINAL HISTORY CHECK BE CONDUCTED PRIOR TO PLACEMENT ON PROSPECTIVE ADOPTIVE PARENTS SEEKING TO ADOPT A MINOR WHO IS IN THE CUSTODY OR PLACEMENT RESPONSIBILITY OF A COUNTY DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL SERVICES AND ON ALL PERSONS 18 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER WHO RESIDE IN THE PROSPECTIVE ADOPTIVE HOME. “Criminal history” means a county, State, or federal conviction of a felony by a court of competent jurisdiction or a pending felony indictment of a crime for child abuse or neglect, spousal abuse, a crime against a child, including child pornography, or for a crime involving violence, including rape, sexual assault, or homicide, other than physical assault or battery; a county, State, or federal conviction of a felony by a court of competent jurisdiction or a pending felony indictment for physical assault, battery, or a drug-related offense, if the offense was committed within the past five years; or similar crimes under federal law or under the laws of other states. Your fingerprints will be used to check the criminal history records of the State Bureau of Investigation (SBI) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI). If it is determined, based on your criminal history, that you are unfit to have responsibility for the safety and well being of children or have an adoptive child reside with you, you shall have the opportunity to complete, or challenge the accuracy of, the information contained in the SBI or FBI identification records. If the prospective adoptive parent is denied a favorable preplacement assessment by a county department of social services as a result of a criminal history check as required under , the prospective adoptive parent may request a review of the assessment pursuant to . G.S. 48-3-309(a) G.S. 48-3-308(a) Any person who intentionally falsifies any information required to be furnished to conduct the criminal history is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.”

History.

1998-229, s. 15; 2005-114, s. 1; 2007-276, ss. 9, 10; 2014-100, s. 17.1(o).

§ 48-3-401.
“Health care facility” and “attending practitioner” defined.

As used in this Article:

“Health care facility” includes a hospital and maternity home; and

“Attending practitioner” includes a physician, licensed nurse, or other licensed professional provider of health care who assists in a birth.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2.

§ 48-3-402.
Authorization required to transfer physical custody.

A health care facility or attending practitioner who has physical custody may release a minor for the purpose of adoption to a prospective adoptive parent or agency not legally entitled to the custody of the minor if, in the presence of an employee of the health care facility or the attending practitioner:

A parent, guardian, or other person or entity having legal custody of the minor signs an authorization of the transfer of physical custody; and

The authorization states that the release is for the purpose of adoption.

The health care facility or attending practitioner shall retain the authorization described in subsection (a) of this section for at least one year.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2.

Part 5. Custody of Minors Pending Final Decree of Adoption.

§ 48-3-501.
Petitioner entitled to custody in direct placement adoptions.

Unless the court orders otherwise, when a parent or guardian places the adoptee directly with the petitioner, the petitioner acquires that parent’s or guardian’s right to legal and continuing physical custody of the adoptee and becomes a person responsible for the care and support of the adoptee, after the earliest of:

The execution of consent by the parent or guardian who placed the adoptee;

The filing of a petition for adoption by the petitioner; or

The execution of a document by a parent or guardian having legal and physical custody of a minor temporarily transferring custody to the petitioner, pending the execution of a consent.

History.

1949, c. 300; 1995, c. 457, s. 2.

§ 48-3-502.
Agency entitled to custody in placement by agency.

Unless the court orders otherwise, during a proceeding for adoption in which an agency places the adoptee with the petitioner:

The agency retains legal but not physical custody of the adoptee until the adoption decree becomes final; but

The agency may delegate to the petitioner responsibility for the care and support of the adoptee.

Before a decree of adoption becomes final, the agency may for cause petition the court to dismiss the adoption proceeding and to restore full legal and physical custody of the minor to the agency; and the court may grant the petition on finding that it is in the best interest of the minor.

History.

1995, c. 457, s. 2.